matxin-fo-en.fo.dix
    <pardef n="jól__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="skýgg/j__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jum</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jnum</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jini</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jini</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>junum</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>janna</l>
          <r>j<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="j/arn__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arni</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arns</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørn</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørnum</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnið</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnið</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arninum</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnsins</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørnini</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørnini</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørnunum</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnanna</l>
          <r>arn<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="skýggj"><i>skýgg</i><par n="skýgg/j__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="barnabarn"><i>barnab</i><par n="j/arn__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="jarn"><i>j</i><par n="j/arn__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="barn"><i>b</i><par n="j/arn__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="jól"><i>jól</i><par n="jól__n_nt"/></e>
